Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 1. Public Officers; General Provisions
§ 25-1-99.
County office hours.

The clerks of the circuit and chancery courts, the county superintendents of education, the county tax assessors, and the sheriffs shall keep their offices at the courthouses of their respective counties if offices shall be there provided for them. If offices shall not be there provided for them, they shall keep their offices within one-half (1/2) mile of the courthouses of their respective counties; except that the office of the county superintendent of education may be placed in the county in any other place determined by the county board of education to be most feasible, regardless of the distance from the courthouse. The offices of all circuit and chancery clerks and sheriffs shall be open for business on all business days from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., except that within the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county, the above county offices may be closed at 12:00 noon one (1) business day of each week, or may be closed all day Saturday of each week, or may be closed at 12:00 noon on Saturday and at 12:00 noon on one (1) additional business day of each week. Such courthouse hours decided upon within the discretion of the board of supervisors must be duly entered at large on the minutes of said board, and such action by the board shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks.

Provided, however, the courthouse shall be closed on all state holidays as set forth in Section 3-3-7, and when any state holiday set forth in Section 3-3-7 falls on a Saturday, the courthouse may be closed on the Friday immediately preceding such Saturday and when such holiday falls on a Sunday, the courthouse may be closed on the Monday immediately succeeding such Sunday. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may close the county offices on those holidays created by executive order of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 33, art 10 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art 190; 1871, § 313; 1880, § 419; 1892, § 3074; 1906, § 3482; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2820; 1930, § 2916; 1942, § 4062; Laws, 1926, ch. 143; Laws, 1942, ch. 209; Laws, 1950, ch. 285; Laws, 1958, ch. 215, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 198; Laws, 1962, ch. 252; Laws, 1964, ch. 284; Laws, 1966, ch. 299, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 286, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 345; Laws, 1976, ch. 304; Laws, 1988, ch 350, § 6; Laws, 1988, ch. 386, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 25-1-100.
Certain personnel records exempt from public access requirements; exceptions.

Personnel records and applications for employment in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, except those which may be released to the person who made the application or with the prior written consent of the person who made the application, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Test questions and answers in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, which are to be used in employment examinations, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Letters of recommendation in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, respecting any application for employment, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Documents relating to contract authorization under Section 25-9-120 shall not be exempt from the provisions of Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Contracts for personal and professional services that are awarded or executed by any state agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Information Technology Services and the Department of Transportation, shall not be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 12; Laws, 1994, ch. 401, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 25-1-101.
State-furnished books.

Every justice of the peace, or other officer to whom the statute laws or other books may be furnished by the state, shall carefully preserve the same and, at the expiration of his term, deliver them to his successor, take his receipt therefor, and file the same in the office of the clerk of the circuit court. In default thereof, the said court, on motion of the clerk or of the successor in office, whose duty it shall be to make such motion, shall enter judgment in favor of the state against the justice or other officer in default for the sum of Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each volume missing and not satisfactorily accounted for, five (5) days’ notice being given of such motion.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 203; 1871, § 326; 1880, § 421; 1892, § 3075; 1906, § 3483; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2821; 1930, § 2917; 1942, § 4063.

§ 25-1-102.
Certain attorneys’ work product exempt from public access requirements.

Records in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, which represent and constitute the work product of any attorney, district attorney or county prosecuting attorney representing a public body and which are related to litigation made by or against such public body, or in anticipation of prospective litigation, including all communications between such attorney made in the course of an attorney-client relationship, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 25-1-103.
Certain offices held by same person.

The offices of the clerk of the circuit and chancery courts may be held by the same person, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, in a county of not exceeding fifteen thousand (15,000) inhabitants.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art 199; 1871, § 322; 1880, § 418; 1892, § 3073; 1906, § 3481; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2819; 1930, § 2918; 1942, § 4064; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1972.

§ 25-1-105.
Application of prohibition against striking to public employees and employers.

All provisions of Section 37-9-75 prohibiting strikes by teachers and teacher organizations and providing penalties therefor, and providing certain responsibilities for members of local school governing boards and school administrators shall likewise apply as far as is practicable to all public employees and public employers respectively.

For purposes of this section, “public employee” means any person holding a position by employment, contract or appointment with a public employer; and

“Public employer” means any governmental entity in this state whose employees are paid in whole or in part by funds appropriated or otherwise provided by the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 351, § 32, eff from and after May 1, 1985.

§ 25-1-107.
Date of postmark as proof of date of payment or report.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, whenever any check, money order or other form of payment or reports is required to be made to any state agency or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state by or before a certain date and the mailing is made by United States mail, then the date that the mail containing the payment or report is postmarked by the United States Post Office shall be considered as the date the payment or report is made. The date of the United States Post Office postmark is proof of the date of payment or report if the payment or report was mailed with postage paid and was correctly addressed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-1-109.
Law enforcement officers prohibited from disclosing identity of person arrested, issued a citation, or being held for misdemeanor.

No law enforcement agency shall disclose the name of any person arrested for any misdemeanor, issued a citation, or being held for any misdemeanor unless such person shall be formally charged and arrested for the offense, except to other law enforcement agencies or to the Mississippi Department of Human Services or child day care providers where such information is used to help determine suitability of persons to serve as child care providers or child service workers. No political subdivision nor any employee thereof shall be held liable for the disclosure of any information prohibited by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 550, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 25-1-111.
Prevention of disclosure by state agencies of social security numbers.

When any state agency mails, delivers, circulates, publishes, distributes, transmits, or otherwise disseminates, in any form or manner, information or material that contains the social security number of an individual, the agency shall take such steps as may be reasonably necessary to prevent the inadvertent disclosure of the individual’s social security number to members of the general public or to persons other than those persons who, in the performance of their duties and responsibilities, have a lawful and legitimate need to know the individual’s social security number. State agencies shall be in compliance with this section on or before July 1, 2003.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 609, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 25-1-113.
Public employment of persons convicted of embezzlement of public funds prohibited.

From and after July 1, 2013, the state and any county, municipality or any other political subdivision shall not employ a person who has been convicted or pled guilty in any court of this state, another state, or in federal court of any felony in which public funds were unlawfully taken, obtained or misappropriated in the abuse or misuse of the person’s office or employment or money coming into the person’s hands by virtue of the person’s office or employment.

From and after July 1, 2014, the state and any county, municipality or any other political subdivision shall not employ or continue to employ a person who has been convicted or pled guilty in any court of this state, another state, or in federal court of any felony in which public funds were unlawfully taken, obtained or misappropriated in the abuse or misuse of the person’s office or employment or money coming into the person’s hands by virtue of the person’s office or employment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 528, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 2014).

§ 25-1-115.
Certain persons prohibited from serving on executive committees.

No person shall serve on any temporary municipal executive committee, municipal executive committee, temporary county executive committee, county executive committee or state executive committee if the person has been convicted of any criminal violation of the Mississippi Election Code, has been convicted of an election crime in this state or any other state, has been convicted of any felony in this state or any other state, has been convicted of an election crime under federal law, has been removed from public office pursuant to Section 25-5-1, or who has resigned from office as part of a plea agreement.

Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in Section 99-19-31 and removed from the committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 25-1-117.
State agencies and public officials providing information about the agency or office to the public on a website are required to regularly review and update that information.

Each state agency and each statewide elected official that provides information to the public about the agency or office on a website on the Internet shall review and update the information on the website on a regular basis, not less frequently than once a month, to ensure that the information appearing on the website is current and that outdated information has been removed or placed in a separate section of archived information.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 25-1-119.
Public bodies, employees, and officers prohibited from creating, planning, participating in, enabling, etc., sanctuary policies.

No state agency, department, political subdivision of this state, county, municipality, university, college, community college or junior college, or any agent, employee or officer thereof shall adopt, or implement a policy, order or ordinance that (a) limits or prohibits any person from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify or report the immigration status of any person; or (b) grants to any person the right to lawful presence or status within the state, a county or municipality, or the campus of a university, college, community college or junior college in violation of state or federal law.

Any policy, order or ordinance adopted in violation of this section shall be invalid and void from the date of its adoption or enactment and shall have no force or effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2017).